zh-CN: 贴花边缘处理: 刺绣封边; 热封边; 激光切割/封边; 拷边; 毛边; 缎面针步包边; 其他
da: Applikationskantens finish: Broderet kant; Varmeforseglet kant; Laserskåret/forseglet kant; Overlock-kant; Rå kant; Platstingskant; Andet
ro-RO: Finisajul marginii aplicației: Margine brodată; Margine sigilată termic; Margine tăiată laser/sigilată; Margine surfilată; Margine netivită; Margine cu cusătură satinată; Altele
nb: Applikasjonskantfinish: Brodert kant; Varmeforseglet kant; Laserskåret / forseglet kant; Overlock-kant; Rå kant; Satengstingkant; Annet
ja: アップリケエッジ仕上げ: 刺繍ボーダー; ヒートシールエッジ; レーザーカット/シールエッジ; メロウエッジ; 切りっぱなし; サテンステッチエッジ; その他
hr-HR: Završna obrada ruba aplikacije: Vezeni rub; Toplinski zavaren rub; Laserski rezan/zavaren rub; Obamitani rub; Neobrađeni rub; Rub sa satenskim bodom; Ostalo
hu: Applikációval díszített szegély: Hímzett szegély; Hőhegesztett szegély; Lézervágott/hegesztett szegély; Pelenkaöltéses szegély; Nyers szegély; Szatén öltéses szegély; Egyéb
sl-SI: Zaključna obdelava roba našitka: Vezena obroba; Toplotno zatesnjen rob; Lasersko izrezan/zatesnjen rob; Obrobljen rob (Merrow); Nepoobšit rob; Rob s satenastim šivom; Drugo
pt-PT: Acabamento do rebordo do debrum: Bordo bordado; Bordo selado a quente; Bordo selado/cortado a laser; Bordo com remate merrow; Bordo a cru; Bordo com ponto de cetim; Outro
ru: Отделка края: Вышитая кайма; Термозапаянный край; Обрезанный лазером/запаянный край; Оверлоченный край; Необработанный край; Обработка края гладью; Другое
sk-SK: Aplikovaná povrchová úprava okrajov: Vyšívaný okraj; Tepelne utesnený okraj; Laserom orezaný/utesnený okraj; Obnitkovaný okraj; Neopracovaný okraj; Saténovo prešívaný okraj; Iná
it: Finitura del bordo con applicazione: Bordo ricamato; Bordo termosaldato; Bordo tagliato a laser/sigillato; Bordo overlock; Bordo a taglio vivo; Bordo a punto pieno; Altro
de: Abschluss der Applikationskanten: Gestickter Rand; Heißversiegelter Rand; Lasergeschnittener/Versiegelter Rand; Gekettelter Rand; Offene Kante; Plattstichrand; Sonstige
tr: Aplike kenar bitişi: İşlemeli kenar; Isı yalıtımlı kenar; Lazer kesim/mühürlü kenar; Sürfileli kenar; İşlenmemiş kenar; Saten dikişli kenar; Diğer
es: Acabado de borde de aplique: Borde bordado; Borde termosellado; Borde cortado/sellado con láser; Borde remallado; Borde sin rematar; Borde de punto festón; Otro
fr: Finition des bords de l’appliqué: Bordure brodée; Bord thermoscellé; Bord découpé au laser/scellé; Bord surjeté; Bord brut; Bord au point de bourdon; Autre
bg-BG: Завършек на ръба на апликацията: Бродиран кант; Термично запечатан ръб; Лазерно изрязан/запечатан ръб; Обверложен ръб; Необработен ръб; Ръб със сатенен бод; Друго
zh-TW: 貼花收邊處理: 刺繡邊界; 熱封邊; 雷射切割/密封邊; 拷克邊; 毛邊; 緞面繡邊; 其他
sv: Kantfinish: Broderad kant; Värmeförseglad kant; Laserskuren/förseglad kant; Overlockkant; Råkant; Plattsömskant; Annan
cs: Zakončení okraje aplikace: Vyšívaný okraj; Tepelně zatavený okraj; Okraj řezaný/zatavený laserem; Obšitý okraj; Nezačištěný okraj; Okraj saténovým stehem; Jiné
ko: 아플리케 가장자리 마감: 자수 테두리; 열접착 마감; 레이저 컷/마감; 메로우 마감; 로우 엣지; 새틴 스티치 마감; 기타
nl: Randafwerking van het appliqué: Geborduurde rand; Warmtegesealde rand; Lasergesneden/-gesealde rand; Festonrand; Onbewerkte rand; Cordonsteekrand; Overig
pl: Wykończenie krawędzi aplikacji: Haftowana obwódka; Zgrzewana krawędź; Krawędź cięta/zgrzewana laserowo; Krawędź owerlokowa; Surowa krawędź; Krawędź ze ściegiem satynowym; Inne
el: Φινίρισμα άκρων απλικέ: Κεντητό περίγραμμα; Θερμοκολλημένο άκρο; Κομμένο με λέιζερ/σφραγισμένο άκρο; Ρελιασμένο άκρο; Ακατέργαστο άκρο; Άκρο με βελονιά σατινέ; Άλλο
th: รูปแบบการตกแต่งขอบแอปพลิเค: ขอบปัก; ขอบซีลความร้อน; ตัดด้วยเลเซอร์/ขอบซีล; ขอบโพ้ง; ขอบปล่อย; ขอบปักทึบซาติน; อื่นๆ
vi: Hoàn thiện cạnh thêu đắp: Viền thêu; Cạnh dán nhiệt; Cạnh cắt/dán laser; Viền vắt sổ chữ O (Merrow); Cạnh thô; Viền thêu nổi (Satin stitch); Khác
fi: Reunaviimeistelyn asennustapa: Brodeerattu reuna; Kuumasaumattu reuna; Laserleikattu/saumattu reuna; Saumurireuna; Käsittelemätön reuna; Satiiniommelreuna; Muu
pt-BR: Acabamento da borda do aplique: Borda bordada; Borda selada a quente; Borda cortada a laser/selada; Borda com costura overloque; Borda crua; Borda em ponto cheio; Outro
lt-LT: Aplikacijos krašto apdaila: Išsiuvinėtas kraštas; Karščiu užlydytas kraštas; Lazeriu pjautas / užlydytas kraštas; Apkantuotas kraštas; Neapdorotas kraštas; Satininio dygsnio kraštas; Kita
en: Applique edge finish: Embroidered border; Heat sealed edge; Laser cut/sealed edge; Merrowed edge; Raw edge; Satin stitch edge; Other